Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-105
Shelterbelts; cooperation with federal government.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds may enter into cooperative agreements with the officers and agents of the United States of America for the improvement by the United States of state educational and other lands, not under the control of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, by the establishment and maintenance thereon of shelterbelts composed of trees, other plants, and necessary protective structures and works.

Laws 1935, c. 144, § 1, p. 538;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-108;

R.S.1943, § 72-105.